Utah statutes.
32A-4-404.   Commission and department duties before granting licenses.
(1) (a)  Before an on-premise banquet license may be granted by the
commission, the department shall conduct an investigation, and may hold public
hearings for the purpose of gathering information and making recommendations
to the commission as to whether or not an on-premise banquet license should be
granted.
(b)  The department shall forward the information and recommendations
described in Subsection (1)(a) to the commission to aid in the commission's
determination.
(2)  Before issuing an on-premise banquet license, the commission shall:
(a)  determine that the applicant has complied with all basic qualifications
and requirements for making application for a license as provided by Sections
32A-4-402 and 32A-4-403;
(b)  determine that the application is complete;
(c)  consider, where appropriate, the locations the on-premise banquet license
applicant proposes to designate for use under an on-premise banquet license,
including:
(i)  the physical characteristics of the locations such as:
(A)  the condition of the premises;
(B)  square footage; and
(C)  parking availability; and
(ii)  operational factors such as:
(A)  tourist traffic;
(B)  demographics; and
(C)  population to be served;
(d)  consider the applicant's ability to manage and operate an on-premise
banquet license, including:
(i)  past management experience;
(ii)  past alcohol license experience; and
(iii)  the type of management scheme to be employed by the on-premise banquet
license applicant;
(e)  consider the nature or type of the on-premise banquet license applicant's
business operation; and
(f)  consider any other factors or circumstances the commission considers
necessary.
